pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Sensores e ferramentas para medição > Medidores e controladores de fluxo: Medidores de vazão de gás; Medidores de vazão de líquido
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 測定機器・センサー > 流量計・コントローラー: ガス流量計; 液体流量計
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de mesure et détecteurs > Débitmètres: Débitmètres de gaz; Débitmètres de liquide
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Meethulpmiddelen en sensoren > Debietmeters en -regelaars: Gasdebietmeters; Vloeistofdebietmeters
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia pomiarowe i czujniki > Mierniki i sterowniki przepływu: Przepływomierze gazu; Przepływomierze cieczy
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία και αισθητήρες μετρήσεων > Μετρητές & ελεγκτές ροής: Μετρητές ροής αερίων; Μετρητές ροής υγρών
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Mittarit ja anturit > Virtausmittarit ja anturit: Kaasuvirtausmittarit; Nestevirtausmittarit
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Meracie nástroje a snímače > Prietokomery a regulátory prietoku: Plynové prietokomery; Prietokomery kvapalín
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Ölçüm Aletleri ve Sensörler > Debimetreler ve Akış Kontrol Cihazları: Gaz Akış Ölçerler; Sıvı Akış Ölçerler
en: Hardware > Tools > Measuring Tools & Sensors > Flow Meters & Controllers: Gas Flow Meters; Liquid Flow Meters
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Strumenti/sensori misurazione > Flussimetri e controllori: Misuratori di portata del gas; Misuratori di portata per liquidi
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Mérőeszközök és érzékelők > Áramlásmérők és vezérlők: Gázáramlásmérők; Folyadékáramlás-mérők
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Sensores y herramientas de medida > Caudalímetros y controladores de caudal: Medidores de flujo de gas; Medidores de flujo de líquido
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Измервателни инструменти и сензори > Разходомери и контролери: Разходомери за газ; Разходомери за течности
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Mätverktyg och sensorer > Flödesmätare och -regulatorer: Gasflödesmätare; Vätskeflödesmätare
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 測量工具和感測器 > 流量計/控制器: 氣體流量計; 液體流量計
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Mjerni alati i senzori > Mjerači protoka i regulatori: Mjerači protoka plina; Mjerači protoka tekućine
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Công cụ đo lường & Cảm biến > Máy đo và điều khiển lưu lượng: Đồng hồ đo lưu lượng khí; Đồng hồ đo lưu lượng chất lỏng
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Měřicí nástroje a přístroje > Průtokoměry: Průtokoměry plynu; Průtokoměry kapalin
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 측정 도구/센서 > 유량계/유량제어계: 기체 유량계; 액체 유량계
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 测量工具与传感器 > 流量计/控制器: 气体流量计; 液体流量计
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas e sensores de medição > Medidores de fluxo e controladores: Medidores de fluxo de gás; Medidores de fuga de líquidos
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือและเซนเซอร์การวัด > เครื่องวัดและควบคุมกระแส: เครื่องวัดการไหลของก๊าซ; เครื่องวัดการไหลของของเหลว
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Måleverktøy og sensorer > Flytmetere og -kontrollere: Gassstrømmålere; Væskestrømmålere
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente de măsură și senzori > Debitmetre și controlere: Debitmetre de gaz; Debitmetre de lichid
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Måleredskaber og -sensorer > Gennemstrømningsmålere: Gasflowmålere; Væskeflowmålere
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Merilna orodja in senzorji > Merilniki in krmilniki pretoka: Merilniki pretoka plinov; Merilniki pretoka tekočin
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber > Durchflussmesser: Gasdurchflussmesser; Flüssigkeitsdurchflussmesser
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Измерительные инструменты и датчики > Расходомеры и регуляторы расхода: Расходомеры для газов; Расходомеры для жидкостей
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Matavimo įrankiai ir jutikliai > Srauto matuokliai ir valdikliai: Dujų srauto matuokliai; Skysčių srauto matuokliai